Wisconsin, session 2025, SB467.
do enact as follows:SB467,11Section 1. 341.35 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB467,2,92341.35 (1) Annual registration fee. In this section “municipality” means a 3town, village or city and “motor vehicle” means an automobile or motor truck 4registered under s. 341.25 (1) (c) at a gross weight of not more than 8,000 pounds. 5The Subject to sub. (1g), the governing body of a municipality or county may enact 6an ordinance imposing an annual flat municipal or county registration fee on all 7motor vehicles registered in this state which are customarily kept in the 8municipality or county. A registration fee imposed under this section shall be in 9addition to state registration fees.SB467,210Section 2. 341.35 (1g) of the statutes is created to read:SB467,2,2111341.35 (1g) Referendum required. (a) A municipality or county that 12proposes to impose a registration fee under sub. (1) shall hold a referendum at a 13regularly scheduled election. The referendum question shall be substantially as 14follows: “Shall [name of municipality or county] impose an annual registration fee 15of [amount of registration fee] on all motor vehicles registered in this state that are 16customarily kept in [name of municipality or county]?” If the question submitted at 17the referendum is approved by a majority of the electors who vote in the 18referendum, the municipality or county may impose the registration fee beginning 19on the first day of the 4th month beginning after the date of the referendum. If the 20referendum question is not approved, the municipality or county may not impose 21any registration fee.SB467,3,1122(b) A municipality or county that imposes a registration fee prior to the 1effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date], shall hold a referendum at a 2regularly scheduled election occurring not later than the first day of the 18th month 3beginning after the effective date of this paragraph .... [LRB inserts date]. The 4referendum question shall be substantially as follows: “Shall [name of municipality 5or county] continue to impose an annual registration fee of [amount of registration 6fee] on all motor vehicles registered in this state that are customarily kept in [name 7of municipality or county]?” If the question submitted at the referendum is 8approved by a majority of the electors who vote in the referendum, the municipality 9or county may continue imposing the registration fee. If the referendum question is 10not approved, the municipality or county may not impose any registration fee after 11the last day of the 3rd month beginning after the date of the referendum.SB467,3,1212